New Jersey, session 221, S2131.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. In addition to the amount of State school aid provided to a school district for the 2023-2024 school year, the Commissioner of Education shall provide Supplemental Transportation Growth Aid to a school district. The amount of aid allocated to a school district pursuant to this section shall equal the sum of: a. the product of $40 and the total number of regular education public pupils and regular education nonpublic pupils eligible for transportation pursuant to N.J.S.18A:39-1, excluding preschool pupils except pupils that qualify for free full-day preschool pursuant to section 12 of this P.L.2007, c.260 (C.18A:7F-54), and of special education pupils eligible for transportation pursuant to N.J.S.18A:46-23 with no special transportation requirements, who are resident in the district as of the last school day prior to October 16 of the prebudget year; and b. the product of $275 and the total number of special education pupils eligible for transportation pursuant to N.J.S.18A:46-23 with special transportation requirements who are resident in the district as of the last school day prior to October 16 of the prebudget year. 2. There is appropriated from the Property Tax Relief Fund to the Department of Education the sum of $31,621,873 to effectuate the purposes of this act. 3. This act shall take effect immediately